Hawaii statutes.
[§586-5.8] Transfer or release of
domestic violence victims from shared wireless plans. (a) The court may
issue an order requiring a wireless telecommunications service provider,
without charge, penalty, or fee, to:

(1) Transfer the billing authority and all rights to
the wireless telephone number or numbers of a shared wireless plan to a
petitioner who has been granted an order for protection pursuant to this
chapter if the petitioner is not the account holder of the shared wireless
plan; provided that if the petitioner is not the protected party named in the
order for protection, the billing authority and rights to the wireless
telephone number or numbers of a shared wireless plan may be transferred to
another person who shall serve as the account holder, as requested by or on
behalf of the protected party with the protected party's approval; or

(2) Remove or release the petitioner from a shared
wireless plan and assign a substitute telephone number or numbers; provided
that if the petitioner is not the protected party named in the order for
protection, the court may order that the protected party be removed or released
from a shared wireless plan and assigned a substitute telephone number or
numbers and order a person, as requested by or on behalf of the protected party
with the protected party's approval, to be the account holder for the
substitute telephone number or numbers.

(b) The order issued pursuant to subsection
(a) shall be a separate order that is directed to the wireless
telecommunications service provider. The order shall list the name and billing
telephone number of the account holder, the name of the person to whom the
telephone number or numbers will be transferred, and each telephone number to
be transferred.

(c) A cause of action shall not lie against
any wireless telecommunications service provider, its officers, employees, or
agents for the actions taken that are related to the transfer of the billing
authority and rights to the wireless telephone number or numbers in accordance with
the terms of a court order issued pursuant to this section.

(d) For purposes of this section:

"Domestic violence" shall have the
same meaning as in section 321-471.

"Wireless telecommunications service"
shall have the same meaning as "commercial mobile radio service" as
defined in title 47 Code of Federal Regulations section 20.3.

"Wireless telecommunications service
provider" means a provider of wireless telecommunications service. [L
2015, c 219, §3]

Cross References

Release of domestic violence victims from shared
wireless plans, see §269-16.93.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next